Yamls/N-kanj_gt-norm.yaml
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [паннезланьӧдззат, паннезланьӧдззит, паннетланьӧдз, паннезытланьӧдз]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [паннетланьви, паннезытланьви]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [паннес, паннезыс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [паннеслӧн, паннезыслӧн]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [паннеслісь, паннезыслісь]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [паннеслӧ, паннезыслӧ]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [паннесӧ, паннезсӧ]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: паннезнас
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [паннескӧт, паннезыскӧт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [паннестӧг, паннезыстӧг, паннезтӧгьяс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [паннесла, паннезысла]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [паннесся, паннезысся]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: паннезас
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [паннезсис, паннесис]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: паннезас
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [паннеслань, паннезыслань, паннезланяс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [паннессянь, паннезыссянь, паннезсяняс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [паннезӧттяс, паннезӧттис]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [паннезӧдззас, паннезӧдззис]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: паннесви
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: паннезланяс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: паннезланьсис
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: паннезланяс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [паннезланьсяняс, паннесланьсянь, паннезысланьсянь]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [паннезланьӧттяс, паннезланьӧттис, паннесланьӧт, паннезысланьӧт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [паннезланьӧдззаc, паннезланьӧдззиc, паннесланьӧдз, паннезысланьӧдз]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: паннесланьви
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: паннезным
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: паннезнымлӧн
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: паннезнымлісь
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: паннезнымлӧ
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: паннезнымӧс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: паннезнаным
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl1: паннезнымкӧт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [паннезнымтӧг, паннезтӧгьяным]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: паннезнымла
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: паннезнымся
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: паннезаным
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [паннезсиным, паннесиным]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: паннезаным
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [паннезнымлань, паннезланяным]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [паннезнымсянь, паннезсяняным]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [паннезӧттяным, паннезӧттиным]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [паннезӧдззаным, паннезӧдззиным]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: паннезнымви
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: паннезланяным
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: паннезланьсиным
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: паннезланяным
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [паннезланьсяняным, паннезнымланьсянь]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [паннезланьӧттяным, паннезланьӧттиным, паннезнымланьӧт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [паннезланьӧдззаным, паннезланьӧдззиным, паннезнымланьӧдз]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: паннезнымланьви
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: паннезныт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: паннезнытлӧн
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: паннезнытлісь
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: паннезнытлӧ
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: паннезнытӧ
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: паннезнаныт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl2: паннезныткӧт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [паннезныттӧг, паннезтӧгьяныт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: паннезнытла
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: паннезнытся
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: паннезаныт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [паннезсиныт, паннесиныт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: паннезаныт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [паннезнытлань, паннезланяныт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [паннезнытсянь, паннезсяняныт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [паннезӧттяныт, паннезӧттиныт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [паннезӧдззаныт, паннезӧдззиныт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: паннезнытви
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: паннезланяныт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: паннезланьсиныт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: паннезланяныт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [паннезланьсяняныт, паннезнытланьсянь]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [паннезланьӧттяныт, паннезланьӧттиныт, паннезнытланьӧт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [паннезланьӧдззаныт, паннезланьӧдззиныт, паннезнытланьӧдз]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: паннезнытланьви
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: паннезныс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: паннезныслӧн
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: паннезныслісь
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: паннезныслӧ
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: паннезнысӧ
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: паннезнаныс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl3: паннезныскӧт
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [паннезныстӧг, паннезтӧгьяныс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: паннезнысла
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: паннезнысся
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: паннезаныс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [паннезсиныс, паннесиныс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: паннезаныс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [паннезныслань, паннезланяныс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [паннезныссянь, паннезсяняныс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [паннезӧттяныс, паннезӧттиныс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [паннезӧдззаныс, паннезӧдззиныс]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: паннезнысви
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: паннезланяныс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: паннезланьсиныс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: паннезланяныс
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [паннезланьсяняныс, паннезнысланьсянь]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [паннезланьӧттяныс, паннезланьӧттиныс, паннезнысланьӧт]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [паннезланьӧдззаныс, паннезланьӧдззиныс, паннезнысланьӧдз]
     кань+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: паннезнысланьви
